Utah statutes.
7-1-712.   Acquisition of office of another financial institution.

Any financial institution authorized to do business in this state may acquire an office of any other financial institution located in this state upon obtaining the prior written approval of the commissioner in the manner provided in Section 7-1-708 for the establishment of a branch.



Amended by Chapter 1, 1986 General Session

